trunk/incubator/apertium-hi.hi.dix
          <r>आ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एगी</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येगी</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँगी</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येंगी</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओगी</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इएगा</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयेगा</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँगी</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येंगी</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="क्/अर__व्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इया</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इये</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इए</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ईं</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अर</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:0"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरतीं</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरना</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरने</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरनी</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरनीं</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरता</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरते</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरती</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरके</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरूँगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरेगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ईजियेगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरिएगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरेगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरेंगे</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरोगे</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ईजियेगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरिएगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरेंगे</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरूँगी</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरेगी</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ईजियेगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरिएगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरेगी</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरेंगी</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरोगी</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ईजियेगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरिएगा</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरेंगी</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="कर"><i>क्</i><par n="क्/अर__व्"/></e>
